Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.050

Certificate of reincorporation—Required—Filing—Contents.

If the application is granted by the director of financial institutions, or by the court, the trustees or directors of the bank shall, within thirty days thereafter, subscribe, acknowledge, and file with the director of financial institutions, in triplicate, a certificate of reincorporation stating:

(1) The name by which the association is to be known;

(2) The place where the association is to be located and its business transacted, naming the city or town and the county, which city or town shall be the same as that where the principal place of business of the bank has theretofore been located;

(3) The name, occupation, residence, and post office address of each signer of the certificate;

(4) The amount of the assets of the association, the amount of its liabilities, and the amount of its contingent, expense, or guaranty fund, as applicable, as of the first day of the calendar month during which the certificate is filed; and

(5) A declaration that each signer will accept the responsibilities and faithfully discharge the duties of a director of the association, and is free from all the disqualifications specified in the laws applicable to savings and loan associations.

[ 1994 c 92 s 474; 1982 c 3 s 84; 1981 c 302 s 35; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.